Utah statutes.
49-20-407.   Insurance mandates.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 31A-1-103(3)(f):

(1)  health coverage offered to the state employee risk pool under Subsection 49-20-202(1)(a) shall comply with the provisions of Sections 31A-8-501 and 31A-22-605.5; and

(2)  a health plan offered to public school districts, charter schools, and institutions of higher education under Subsection 49-20-201(1)(b) shall comply with the provisions of Section 31A-22-605.5.

